Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201282-332
Nebraska Arts
and Humanities Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
The Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist
of all funds credited from the Nebraska Cultural Preservation Endowment Fund
pursuant to section 82-331. The Nebraska Arts Council shall administer and
distribute the Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund. All disbursements from
the Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund shall be matched dollar-for-dollar
by sources other than state funds. The match funds shall be new money generated
for endowments established by the Nebraska Arts Council or Nebraska Humanities
Council or qualified endowments of their constituent organizations, new money
generated as a result of seed grants to recipients, or new money generated
by the Nebraska Arts Council or Nebraska Humanities Council for arts or humanities
education. Matching funds shall also include earnings generated by qualified
private endowments formed in accordance with this section. For
purposes of this section, new money means a contribution to a qualified endowment
generated after July 1, 2011. Contributions not fully matched by state funds
shall be carried forward to succeeding years and remain available to provide
a dollar-for-dollar match for state funds. For an endowment to
be a qualified endowment (a) the endowment must meet the standards set by
the Nebraska Arts Council or Nebraska Humanities Council, (b) the endowment
must be intended for long-term stabilization of the organization, and (c)
the funds of the endowment must be endowed and only the earnings thereon expended.
An organization is a constituent organization if it receives funding from
the Nebraska Arts Council or Nebraska Humanities Council and is tax exempt
under section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code. The match funds required by
this section shall not include in-kind contributions. The budget division
of the Department of Administrative Services shall approve allotment and disbursement
of funds from the Nebraska Arts and Humanities Cash Fund only to the extent
the Nebraska Arts Council has provided documentation of the dollar-for-dollar
match required by this section. Funds from the Nebraska Arts and Humanities
Cash Fund may be used for the purpose of obtaining challenge grants from the
National Endowment for the Humanities or the National Endowment for the Arts.

(2) Rules and regulations of the Nebraska Arts Council shall
provide that the ultimate use of disbursements from the Nebraska Arts and
Humanities Cash Fund shall be in a ratio of seventy percent to projects, endowments,
or programs designated by the Nebraska Arts Council and thirty percent to
projects, endowments, or programs designated by the Nebraska Humanities Council.

(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall
be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 799, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 24;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 12.
April 3, 2012
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.